Utah statutes.
11-36a-204.   Other names for impact fees.

(1)  A fee that meets the definition of impact fee under Section 11-36a-102 is an impact fee subject to this chapter, regardless of what term the local political subdivision or private entity uses to refer to the fee.

(2)  A local political subdivision or private entity may not avoid application of this chapter to a fee that meets the definition of an impact fee under Section 11-36a-102 by referring to the fee by another name.

